Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-314
Rules; power of Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Rules may be adopted by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds found necessary for carrying out the purposes and provisions of sections 72-301 to 72-314, and such rules, where not in conflict with said sections, shall have the same force and effect.

Laws 1918, Thirty-sixth Spec. Sess., c. 7, § 15, p. 48;

C.S.1922, § 5233;

C.S.1929, § 72-314;

R.S.1943, § 72-314.